Maryland, session 2026, HB0095.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0095*

HOUSE BILL 95
Article – Family Law
2–402.
(a) An applicant for a license may apply to the clerk only at the office of the clerk
during regular office hours.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (d) SUBSECTIONS (D) AND (E) of this
section, to apply for a license, [one of the] BOTH parties to be married shall:
(1) appear before the clerk and give, under oath, the following information,
which shall be placed on an application form by the clerk:
(i) the full legal name of each party;
(ii) the place of residence of each party;
(iii) the date of birth of each party;
(iv) whether the parties are related by blood or marriage and, if so,
in which degree of relationship;
(v) the marital status of each party; and
(vi) whether either party was married previously, and the date and
place of each death or judicial determination that ended any former marriage;
(2) sign the application form; and
(3) provide the clerk with:
(i) the Social Security number of each party who has a Social
Security number; and
(ii) a copy of an official government–issued birth certificate or other
official government–issued document or record demonstrating the age STATING THE DATE
OF BIRTH of each party.
(d) (1) If the parties to be married are not residents of the county where the
marriage ceremony is to be performed, the clerk shall accept, instead of the application
specified in subsection (b) of this section, an affidavit from one BOTH of the parties to be
married.
(2) The AN affidavit required under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall:

HOUSE BILL 95 3
(i) contain the information required by subsection (b) of this section;
and
(ii) be sworn to under oath before a clerk or other comparable official
in the county, state, province, or country where the party resides ONE OF THE PARTIES
RESIDES.
(E) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, IF A PARTY TO
BE MARRIED IS UNABLE TO APPEAR BEFORE A CLERK IN THE COUNTY WHERE THE
MARRIAGE IS TO BE PERFORMED DUE TO MILITARY SERVICE, HOSPITALIZATION,
INCARCERATION, OR OTHER GOOD CAUSE SHOWN, THE CLERK MAY ACCEPT,
INSTEAD OF THE APPLICATION SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, AN
AFFIDAVIT FROM BOTH OF THE PARTIES TO BE MARRIED.
(2) AN AFFIDAVIT REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL:
(I) CONTAIN THE INFORMATION REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION (B)
OF THIS SECTION;
(II) STATE THE SPECIFIC REASON THE PARTY IS UNABLE TO
APPEAR IN PERSON;
(III) BE SWORN TO UNDER OATH; AND
(IV) BE COMPLETED ON A FORM PROVIDED BY THE COURT
ADMINISTRATOR.
(3) THE CLERK MAY REQUEST ADDITIONAL DOCUMENTATION,
INCLUDING PROOF OF:
(I) MILITARY SERVICE;
(II) HOSPITALIZATION;
(III) INCARCERATION; OR
(IV) OTHER GOOD CAUSE.
[(e)] (F) Until a license becomes effective, a clerk may not disclose the fact that
an application for a license has been made except to the parent or guardian of a party to be
married.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.

HOUSE BILL 95
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.